Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8720
Public disclosure of data and information.

A patient safety organization shall release to the public nonidentifiable aggregate trend data identifying the number and types of patient safety events that occur. A patient safety organization shall publish educational and evidence-based information from the summary reports, which shall be available to the public, that can be used by all providers to improve the care they provide.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 20.